Hawaii, session 2026, HB2053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 11-357, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§11-357[]]  Contributions to candidate committees; limits[.]; contributions to state elected officials; when prohibited.  (a)  No person shall make contributions to: (1)  A candidate seeking nomination or election to a two‑year office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate amount greater than $2,000 during an election period; (2)  A candidate seeking nomination or election to a four‑year nonstatewide office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate amount greater than $4,000 during an election period; or (3)  A candidate seeking nomination or election to a four‑year statewide office or to a candidate committee in an aggregate amount greater than $6,000 during an election period. (b) For purposes of this section, the length of term of an office shall be the usual length of term of the office as unaffected by reapportionment, a special election to fill a vacancy, or any other factor causing the term of the office the candidate is seeking to be less than the usual length of term of that office. (c)  No state elected official shall solicit or accept campaign contributions during any regular session or special session of the legislature, including any extension of any regular session or special session, and any legislative recess day, holiday, or weekend. (d)  For purposes of this section: "Session" means a period in which both legislative houses are in session. "State elected official" means an individual who currently holds an elected state office, including the governor, lieutenant governor, state senator, state representative, trustee of the office of Hawaiian affairs, and any individual appointed to serve in any of the aforementioned offices." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.